test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_4st_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    aatelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aatelistám
    acâgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: acâgâst
    aittâlâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aittâlâst
    almostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almostitám
    almostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almostit
    analysistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: analysistám
    argumentistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: argumentistám
    arvâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvâlistám
    assimilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: assimilistám
    capâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: capâlistám
    ciláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciláiditám
    cimcâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cimcâhist
    ciähhááškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciähhááškuát
    cullâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cullâguáđám
    culáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: culáiditám
    cuáŋuidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáŋuidit
    delegistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: delegistám
    desinfistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: desinfistám
    eleškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eleškuáđám
    eleškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eleškuát
    falâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâlistám
    fiäránistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiäránistám
    formatistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: formatistiim
    harijdâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harijdâtâm
    hirmástuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástutám
    hiäibustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibust
    hiäibuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibut
    hiäiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäilut
    hiäimustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäimust
    huolâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huolâstuđâm
    huvreluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huvrelutám
    huámášittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huámášitám
    huáppulittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huáppulitám
    huššâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huššâlitám
    hámmáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámmáristám
    hápármistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hápármistám
    hälhistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hälhistât
    installistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: installistám
    itelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: itelistám
    iäláskittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäláskitám
    iänáduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iänádutám
    iänáduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iänádut
    iärvádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iärváditám
    iätkálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätkálitám
    jamâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jamâstutám
    jamâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jamâstut
    jiellâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiellâhistám
    jieŋâlmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jieŋâlmitám
    jiärmásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiärmásmitám
    jiäválmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiäválmitám
    jolâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jolâstutám
    jođálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođálmitám
    julestistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julestistám
    juoigâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoigâst
    jurbâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurbâsmitám
    jurgâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurgâlitám
    jurâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurâlitám
    jyevdilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jyevdilistám
    jávuttuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jávuttutám
    jávuttuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jávuttut
    kalmadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalmaditám
    kavreluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavrelutám
    kavâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavâkuáđám
    kaččâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaččâlitám
    kemmâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kemmâguát
    keččâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keččâlistâm
    keččâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keččâlitám
    kihárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kihárit
    kildásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kildásmitám
    kiäldálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldálitám
    kiämáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiämáiditám
    kiäpásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäpásmitám
    kiävhudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiävhuditám
    kolaristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolaristám
    kommentistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kommentistám
    komolistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: komolistám
    kompostistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kompostistám
    konfirmistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: konfirmistám
    kopijistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopijistám
    koppáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koppáristám
    kotârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kotâritám
    kovláhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kovláhitám
    koškádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koškádit
    koškáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koškáhitám
    kuoirâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoirâš
    kursivistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kursivistám
    kuáikkusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáikkus
    kuákkiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuákkilutám
    kuámmáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuámmáristám
    kuávdálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávdálistám
    kuávdásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávdásmitám
    kuávšudittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávšuditám
    kuškâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškálutám
    kuđáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuđáidit
    kásánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kásánit
    käpilittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käpilitám
    kärŋiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kärŋilutám
    lappâdistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lappâdistám
    lavâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lavâlistám
    ledâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ledâgitám
    lievlistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lievlistitám
    lievlistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lievlistit
    linástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: linástit
    liäđáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liäđáhitám
    liäđáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liäđáhittiđ
    luoihâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoihât
    luovâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovâsmitám
    läittilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: läittilistám
    markkânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: markkânistám
    meddâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meddâlistám
    mieigâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mieigâd
    mielâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mielâstutám
    mittádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mittáditám
    modernistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: modernistâm
    moiváristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moiváristám
    mokkádistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mokkádistám
    moottoristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moottoristám
    movtijdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: movtijditám
    mođárdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mođárditám
    muálkkiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muálkkilutám
    mučismittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučismitám
    mučâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mučâsmitám
    myensteristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: myensteristám
    nanosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nanosmitám
    navigistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: navigistám
    njalahistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njalahistám
    njihinjistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njihinjistám
    njihânjistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njihânjistám
    njopálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njopálistám
    njulčâhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njulčâhitám
    njunevuálástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njunevuáláást
    njálgásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njálgásmitám
    nohádistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nohádistám
    nohádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noháditám
    nubásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nubásmitám
    nuorâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuorâsmitám
    nuáigistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáigist
    nälistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nälistitám
    ohtâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ohtâlistám
    olgoštittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olgoštitám
    olášuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: olášut
    orosistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orosistám
    orostistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostistám
    orostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orostitám
    ovdâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovdâhistám
    ovtâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ovtâstitám
    pahâdistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pahâdistám
    paldâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldâlistám
    pallâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallâhistám
    pallâkyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallâkuádám
    parahittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parahitám
    pastalmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastalmitám
    patârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: patâritám
    pehtilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehtilistám
    pehtilittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pehtilitám
    pirâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pirâstit
    pivnohistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivnohistám
    piäiváduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäivádutám
    piävtálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävtálmitám
    piäđguidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piäđguiditám
    piäđguidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäđguidit
    polâškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: polâškuáđám
    potoristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: potoristám
    povvâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povvâstitám
    povčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povčâgitám
    počâšmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: počâšmitám
    profetistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: profetistám
    puljârittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puljâritám
    pullárittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pulláritám
    puosâškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puosâškuáđám
    puuteristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puuteristám
    puáhánjistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáhánjistám
    puáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáibild
    puáidudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáidud
    puáidášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáidáš
    puánhármistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puánhármistám
    puárásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puárásmitám
    puátilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puátilistám
    puškáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puškáristám
    pyeredistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pyeredistám
    pygálystiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pygálystâm
    páhudistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páhudistám
    pájálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pájálistám
    páláttistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páláttistám
    pánáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pánáiditám
    päjittittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittitám
    ratifisistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ratifisistám
    rationalisistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rationalisistám
    registeeriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: registeeriim
    registeristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: registeristám
    rekinistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rekinistám
    restauristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: restauristám
    ripálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ripálitám
    ropâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ropâguáđám
    ropâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ropâguát
    ruoinâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruoinâš
    ruokâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruokâsmitám
    ruossâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruossâlistám
    ruotâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâsmitám
    ruotâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâstitám
    ruáhásistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáhásistám
    ruáinudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáinud
    ruáiskuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáiskulâm
    ruásigyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruásiguáđám
    ruávdádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruávdádit
    ruávdáduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruávdádut
    ruáváidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáváiditám
    rušmosmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rušmosmitám
    rátkádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rátkáditám
    rávhuiduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rávhuidut
    rávhuttuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rávhuttudám
    sajaidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajaiditám
    sajaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajalditám
    sajostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajostitám
    saneeristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saneeristám
    sappadistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sappadistám
    sapâristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sapâristám
    savadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savadit
    savŋelittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savŋelitám
    saŋadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋadit
    sesâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sesâlistám
    sierânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierânistám
    siskálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siskálmitám
    siäiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siäilut
    siävŋánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävŋánitám
    skačâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skačâlitám
    skerčádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčáiditám
    skerčádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skerčádittiđ
    skerčáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčáiditám
    skerčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčâgitám
    skilottuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skilottutám
    skiláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiláiditám
    skiđármistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiđármistám
    skuáibááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuáibát
    skuápálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuápálitám
    skučálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skučálistám
    snielâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snielâhistám
    sohâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sohâlut
    sonnâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sonnâlist
    sovsâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovsâlutám
    spejâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spejâlist
    stapâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapâlistám
    stavâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stavâlist
    stemppâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stemppâlistám
    sterilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sterilistám
    stálpástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stálpástitám
    suddâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suddâlutám
    sulâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sulâstit
    suoivânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoivânistám
    suollâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suollâgitám
    suopâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suopâlistám
    suotâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstitám
    suvčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suvčâgitám
    suáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáibild
    suáibuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáibut
    suáládittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáláditám
    suáđistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáđistitám
    sáváidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sáváidit
    tabettistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tabettistám
    tievâsmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tievâsmitám
    tiäivásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäivás
    tiätásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiätásmitám
    tiŋgâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiŋgâstitám
    tiškáhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiškáhitám
    tolânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolânistám
    tolânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tolânist
    topsástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: topsástitám
    toskástuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toskástut
    tuoldiistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoldiistitám
    turáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turáiditám
    tuáivuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáivut
    tuálvástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuálvástitám
    tálvádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tálvádit
    tärkkilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tärkkilistám
    ucedistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucedistám
    umástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: umástitám
    umástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: umástit
    unohistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unohistám
    uáinistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáinist
    uáinistiškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáinistiškuádám
    uáivildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáivild
    uápásmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uápásmitám
